Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202639-1638
Rural road improvement district; terms, defined.

For purposes of the Rural Road Improvement District Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Board, board of county commissioners, or board of county supervisors means the governing body of the county;

(2) District means a rural road improvement district created under the Rural Road Improvement District Act;

(3) Improvement means the completed road, or roads, and all work incidental thereto; and

(4) Person includes any individual, corporation, partnership, and limited liability company.

Laws 1963, c. 213, § 1, p. 680;

Laws 1981, LB 200, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 212;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 50.
July 18, 2026